Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-266
County agricultural society; dissolution; effect.

Upon the dissolution and the abandonment under section 2-265:

(1) All the real and personal property which has been purchased for or by the county agricultural society may be sold or disposed of by the county board in whole or in part and from time to time in the same manner as other properties of the county may lawfully be sold or disposed of. If any of such property is appropriate or available for any other lawful use or purpose of such county, the county board may appropriate, use, and apply any of such property to any such other lawful use or purpose; and

(2) Such county agricultural society shall cease to exist as an official body of such county except for the purpose of making its final report and accounting and returning its records to the county board.

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 17.